Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3307
Provider contracts; director approval required; report.

(1) Provider contracts, and changes thereto, made between an insurer, whose purpose is restricted to transacting legal expense insurance and business reasonably related thereto, and providing attorneys or other providers of services covered by the legal expense insurance policy shall be filed with the director and shall not become effective until approved by the director.

(2) Legal expense insurers shall annually report to the director, in such detail as the director reasonably requires, the number and geographical distribution of attorneys and other providers of services covered by the legal expense insurance policy with whom they maintain contractual relations and the nature of the relations. For individual insurers or groups of insurers the directors may require more frequent reports.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 7.